North Dakota, session 69, SB2103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subdivision to subsection 2 of section 57-38-30.3 of the North Dakota
Century Code is created and enacted as follows:
Reduced by the amount of a segal Americorps education award disbursed under
42 U.S.C. 12604 and received by a taxpayer during the taxable year to the extent
the amount was included in federal taxable income.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 1 25.0466.01000